Arkansas, session 2025, SB513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 36, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
5-36-127. Mail theft.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Mail" means a letter, postcard, parcel, envelope, package,
bag, or another sealed article addressed to another person, along with its
contents;
(2) "Mail depository" means a mail box, letter box, or mail
receptacle of a postal service, an office of a postal service, or a vehicle
of a postal service; and
(3) "Postal service" means the United States Postal Service or
its contractors or any commercial courier that delivers mail.
(b) A person commits mail theft if he or she knowingly:
*ANS326*
03/18/2025 4:21:13 PM ANS326

SB513
(1) Takes or exercises unauthorized control over or makes an
unauthorized transfer of an interest in the mail of another person that is in
a mail depository or with a postal service for the purpose of depriving the
other person of the mail;
(2) Obtains the mail of another person by deception or by threat
with the purpose of depriving the other person of the mail; or
(3) Sells, receives, possesses, transfers, buys, or conceals
mail obtained unlawfully as prohibited by subdivision (b)(1) or subdivision
(b)(2) of this section, while knowing or having reason to know the mail was
obtained unlawfully.
(c) Mail theft is a:
(1) Class D felony for a first offense; or
(2) Class A felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(d) In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (c) of this
section, a person convicted of mail theft under this section shall be ordered
to make full restitution to the victim and any other person who has suffered
a financial loss as a result of the offense of mail theft.
(e) Mail theft may be prosecuted in any of the following counties:
(1) The county where the offense occurred; or
(2) The county of residence or place of business of the direct
or indirect victim.

5-36-128. Theft or unauthorized reproduction of a mail receptacle key
or lock.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Mail" means a letter, postcard, parcel, envelope, package,
bag, or another sealed article addressed to another person, along with its
contents; and
(2) "Postal service" means the United States Postal Service or
its contractors or any commercial courier that delivers mail.
(b) A person commits theft or unauthorized reproduction of a mail
receptacle key or lock if he or she:
(1) Commits theft of a key or lock adopted by a postal service
for a box or other authorized receptacle for the deposit or delivery of mail;
or
(2) Knowingly makes, forges, or counterfeits a key or possesses
03/18/2025 4:21:13 PM ANS326

SB513
a key or lock adopted by a postal service that delivers mail with the purpose
to unlawfully use, sell, or otherwise dispose of the key or lock or to cause
the key or lock to be unlawfully used, sold, or otherwise disposed.
(c) Theft or unauthorized reproduction of a mail receptacle key or
lock is a:
(1) Class D felony for a first offense; or
(2) Class A felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(d) In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (c) of this
section, a person convicted of theft or unauthorized reproduction of a mail
receptacle key or lock shall be ordered to make full restitution to the
victim and any other person who has suffered a financial loss as a result of
the offense.
(e) Theft or unauthorized reproduction of a mail receptacle key or
lock may be prosecuted in any of the following counties:
(1) The county where the offense occurred; or
(2) The county of residence or place of business of the direct
or indirect victim.



















03/18/2025 4:21:13 PM ANS326